South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S65.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-63-280 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-63-280. (A) For purposes of this section, "paging device" means a telecommunications, to include mobile telephones, device that emits an audible signal, vibrates, displays a message, or otherwise summons or delivers a communication to the possessor. "wireless electronic communication device" means an electronic device such as a telephone, personal digital assistant, paging device, text-messaging device, watch, or any other device similar in function that can be used to wirelessly communicate with another person or a device used to listen to such wireless communication devices. (B) The board of trustees of each school district shall must adopt a policy that addresses student possession of paging devices wireless electronic communication devices. as defined in subsection (A)The policy, at a minimum, must include a prohibition of the use of a personal wireless electronic communication device in classrooms during periods of academic instruction. This policy must be included in the district's written student conduct standards. If the policy includes confiscation of a paging device, as defined in subsection (A), it should also provide for the return of the device to the owner. (C) The board of trustees of each school district must adopt a policy that addresses employee use of a personal wireless electronic communication device. The policy, at a minimum, must include a prohibition of the use of wireless electronic communication devices in classrooms during periods of academic instruction when students are present. (D) If the policy includes confiscation of a wireless electronic communication device, it must also provide for the return of the device to the owner. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----